Alabama, session 2026rs, SB252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known as the Sarah
Caldwell Crosby Act.
Section 2. Section 41-9-548, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended as follows:
"§41-9-548
(a)(1) All full-time employees of the authority shall
be treated as state employees for the purposes of
participating in any insurance programs provided for the state
employees.
(b)(2) The authority shall pay the employer's
contributions to any insurance programs out of funds
appropriated to it or otherwise available to it for any
purpose whatsoever. The authority may deduct the employees'
contributions for such programs by means of payroll deductions
or otherwise from the compensation paid to the employees.
(b)(1) All employees of the authority shall be members
of the unclassified service for purposes of Section 36-26-10.
(2) Any employee of the authority employed as of the
effective date of the act adding this subsection shall be
entitled to payment for his or her accumulated leave upon
Page 1

entitled to payment for his or her accumulated leave upon
SB252 Enrolled
separation from service, and any employee hired after the
effective date shall be entitled to such payment only to the
extent generally provided to unclassified employees in the
Merit System, consistent with generally applicable
administrative rules adopted by the State Personnel
Department."
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.

Page 2

SB252 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB252
Senate 17-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 10-Mar-26




By: Senator Hatcher
Page 3